hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babaszállítás > Baba- és csecsemő autósülések: Ülésmagasítók; Autósülés babakocsik; Átalakítható autósülések; Gyermek autósülések
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Prijevoz za bebe > Autosjedalice za bebe i malu djecu: Booster sjedalice; Autosjedalica za kolica; Konvertibilne autosjedalice; Autosjedalice za dojenčad
nb: Baby og barn > Babytransport > Bilstoler for baby og barn: Beltestoler; Bilsetevogner; Konvertible bilseter; Bilseter for spedbarn
it: Bebè e bimbi > Trasporto bebè > Seggiolini per auto: Sedili rialzati; Passeggini per seggiolino auto; Seggiolini per auto convertibili; Seggiolini per auto per bambini
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Xe đẩy cho trẻ em > Ghế ngồi ô tô cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ: Ghế nâng ngồi ô tô; Xe đẩy ngồi ô tô; Ghế ngồi ô tô đa năng; Ghế ngồi ô tô cho trẻ sơ sinh
sk-SK: Bábätká > Preprava detí > Dojčenské autosedačky: Podsedáky; Kočíky s autosedačkou; Konvertibilné autosedačky; Detské autosedačky
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Taşıma Ürünleri > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Oto Koltukları: Yükseltici Koltuklar; Araba Koltuğu Bebek Arabaları; Konvertibl Oto Koltukları; Bebek Oto Koltukları
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių transportas > Automobilinės kėdutės kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams: Sėdynių pagalvėlės; Automobilinės kėdutės-vežimėliai; Transformuojamos automobilinės kėdutės; Automobilinės kėdutės kūdikiams
pt-BR: Infantil > Transporte de bebês > Cadeiras de bebê para automóvel: Assentos elevatórios; Carrinhos com cadeira para carro; Cadeiras conversíveis para carro; Cadeiras infantis para carro
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Prevoz otrok > Avtosedeži za dojenčke in malčke: Podporni sedeži; Vozički z avtosedeži; Zložljivi avtosedeži; Avtosedeži za novorojenčke
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Transporte do bebé > Cadeirinhas automóveis para bebé e criança: Assentos elevatórios; Carrinhos para cadeirinhas automóveis; Cadeirinhas automóveis conversíveis; Cadeirinhas automóveis para bebé
da: Baby og småbørn > Babytransport > Baby og småbørn – bilsæder: Booster-sæder; Autostole-klapvogne; Konvertible autostole; Autostole til spædbørn
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babytransport > Baby- & Kleinkindautositze: Sitzerhöhungen; Autositz-Kinderwagen; Umklappbare Autositze; Kleinkindersitz fürs Auto
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přeprava dětí > Dětské a kojenecké autosedačky: Podsedáky do auta; Kočárky s autosedačkou; Kombinované autosedačky; Autosedačky pro kojence
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Transport > Baby & Toddler Car Seats: Booster Seats; Car Seat Strollers; Convertible Car Seats; Infant Car Seats
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Transport niemowląt > Foteliki samochodowe dla dzieci i niemowląt: Foteliki samochodowe typu booster; Wózki montowane do siedzeń samochodowych; Uniwersalne foteliki samochodowe; Foteliki samochodowe dla niemowląt
ru: Товары для детей > Прогулки и путешествия с детьми > Автокресла: Кресла-бустеры; Коляски-автокресла; Автокресла-трансформеры; Автокресла для младенцев
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan kuljetus > Vauvan ja leikki-ikäisen autonistuimet: Korokeistuimet; Autoon sopivat lastenvaunut; Muunnettavat turvaistuimet; Lasten turvaistuimet
nl: Baby en peuter > Baby's vervoeren > Autozitjes voor baby's en peuters: Zitjes voor kinderen; Autozitjes die bruikbaar zijn als wandelwagens; Converteerbare autozitjes; Autozitjes voor baby's
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Transportul bebelușilor > Scaune auto pentru bebeluși/copii mici: Scaune pentru ridicare; Cărucioare cu scaun auto; Scaune auto convertibile; Scaune auto pentru copii
sv: Baby och småbarn > Barntransport > Bilbarnstolar: Bilbarnsitsar; Bilbarnvagnar; Konvertibla bilbarnstolar; Bilbarnstolar för spädbarn
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешки транспорт > Столчета за кола за бебета и малки деца: Бустерни седалки; Детски столчета за кола; Трансформиращи столчета за кола; Столчета за кола за бебета
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเคลื่อนย้ายเด็กทารก > ที่นั่งในรถสำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก: บูสเตอร์ซีท; รถเข็นคาร์ซีท; คาร์ซีทแบบปรับรูปแบบได้; คาร์ซีทสำหรับเด็กทารก
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Transporte de bebés > Sillas de coche: Elevadores; Cochecitos con asiento de coche; Asientos de coche convertibles; Asientos de coche para bebés
ko: 영유아 > 영유아용 캐리어 > 영유아 카시트: 부스터 카시트; 카시트 유모차; 컨버터블 카시트; 유아용 카시트
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿出行用品 > 婴幼儿汽车座椅: 增高座椅; 安全座椅推车; 可调式汽车座椅; 婴儿提篮
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Μεταφορά βρέφους > Βρεφικά & παιδικά καθίσματα αυτοκινήτου: Καθίσματα ανύψωσης; Καροτσάκια με ενσωματωμένα καθίσματα αυτοκινήτου; Μετατρεπόμενα καθίσματα αυτοκινήτου; Βρεφικά καθίσματα αυτοκινήτου
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用外出用品 > チャイルドシート: ブースターシート; チャイルドシートベビーカー; コンバーチブルカーシート; 幼児用カーシート
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒外出用品 > 嬰幼兒汽車安全座椅: 成長椅; 汽車座椅加推車; 雙向型安全座椅; 嬰兒汽車座椅
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Transport de bébés > Sièges auto pour bébés et enfants: Réhausseurs; Poussettes de siège auto; Sièges auto convertibles; Sièges auto pour bébé